test/src/morphology/N-silm36_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - silm: # Noun (36) silm 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     silm+N+Sg+Nom: silm
     silm+N+Sg+Gen: silmä
     silm+N+Sg+Par: silmä
     silm+N+Sg+Ill: silmä
     silm+N+Pl+Gen: silmi
     silm+N+Pl+Par: silmi
     silm+N+Pl+Ill: [silmihe, silmi]
     silm+N+Pl+All: silmile
